District of Columbia statutes.
33-419

Repealed

Duty of partners to render information.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 640, Pub. L. 87-709, § 20
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1973 Ed., § 41-319.
1981 Ed., § 41-119.